Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Ten Million Eight Hundred Twelve Thousand Four Hundred Eight
Dollars ($10,812,408.00) shall be used for program growth and to
replace funding no longer available due to the reduction of federal
matching dollars.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Nine Million Four Hundred Eighty Thousand Four Hundred
Twenty-one Dollars ($9,480,421.00) shall be used to meet the
obligations required in the consent decree pursuant to case number

23-cv-81-GKF-JFJ filed in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of Oklahoma.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Eighteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($18,500,000.00) shall be used for the continuum of care for
children in crisis.
SECTION 4. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of One Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,300,000.00)
shall be used to maintain services for veterans and their families.
SECTION 5. The Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance
Abuse Services may request through the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services the early transfer by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission of tax collections to the General Revenue
Fund for the purpose of early allocation to the Department’s
disbursing funds to alleviate cash-flow problems.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1140 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1140 Page 3